Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 5 Beer and Wine — Manufacture, Sale, and Transportation Generally
3-5-302. Applications — Qualifications of applicant.

(a)

A license shall not be issued to any person authorizing the sale of beer at retail unless the person shall file a verified application, accompanied by the fee required by law, and shall state in the application that he or she possesses the following qualifications:

(1)(A)

The applicant is a person of good moral character, a citizen or resident alien of the United States, and a resident of the county in which the permit will be operated or resides within thirty-five (35) miles of the address of the premises described in the application.

(B)

However, the residency requirement under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section does not apply to a managing agent of a partnership, corporation, or an association that is an applicant if:

(i)

The applicant currently holds at least two (2) permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for the sale of alcoholic beverages; and

(ii)

The applicant designates with the division a representative who resides within the county of the premises or within thirty-five (35) miles of the address of the premises described in the application;

(2)

The applicant has not been convicted of a felony or has not been convicted within five (5) years of the date of his or her application of any violation of the laws of this state or the laws of any other state relating to the sale of alcoholic beverages;

(3)

The applicant has not had revoked, within five (5) years next-preceding his or her application, any license issued to him or her under the laws of this state or any other state to sell alcoholic liquor of any kind;

(4)

The applicant is the owner of the premises for which the license is sought or the holder of an existing lease, buy-sell agreement, offer and acceptance, or option to lease thereon;

(5)

If the applicant is a copartnership, all members of the partnership shall be qualified to obtain a license; and

(6)(A)(i)

If the applicant is a corporation, the president and directors, any stockholder owning more than five percent (5%) of the stock of the corporation who are not exempted under subdivision (a)(6)(A)(ii) of this section, and the person or persons who will conduct and manage the licensed premises for the corporation shall possess all the qualifications required herein for an individual license.

(ii)

An applicant is not required to state the identity of its shareholders who are not the president or a director when the corporation:

(a)

Is publicly traded on a nationally recognized stock exchange; or

(b)

Holds at least ten (10) permits issued by the division for the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(B)

The requirement as to residence in the United States or citizenship of the United States does not apply to officers, directors, and stockholders of the corporation but does apply to any officer, director, or stockholder who is also the manager of the licensed premises in any capacity in the conduct or operation of the licensed premises.

(b)

If a retailer permitted under this section chooses to exercise the exemption to the residency requirements contained in subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, the retailer, after the issuance of the second permit issued to the permitted retailer by the division, may:

(1)(A)

Change the managing agent of each of its permits by completing a form provided by the division.

(B)(i)

A managing agent named under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be a person of good moral character and a citizen or resident alien of the United States.

(ii)

A managing agent named under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall not be required to meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section; and

(2)

Designate a representative for each permitted premises who resides within the county of the premises or within thirty-five (35) miles of the address of the premises stated on the permit.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 244, § 1; 1967, No. 239, § 2; 1973, No. 189, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-528; Acts 1989, No. 295, § 1; 1991, No. 606, § 5; 1995, No. 536, § 1; 1999, No. 948, § 1; 2013, No. 325, § 3; 2015, No. 1044, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Subdivision (2) of this section may be superseded by §17-1-103 which provides for the removal of an automatic disqualification for criminal convictions in obtaining permits and licenses for professions, trades, or occupations.

Acts 1991, No. 606, § 11, provided:

“It is the intent of this law to no longer require citizenship of the United States in order for a person to hold certain ABC licenses and to eliminate the requirement that persons be a resident of the State of Arkansas for two (2) years prior to the time that they make application for an ABC license. It is also the intent of this law that persons no longer be required to be registered voters in the county in which the permit is located and it is further intended that a person must either reside in the county where the premises is located or live within twenty-five (25) miles of the address of the permitted outlet. It is also the intent of this legislation that proof of payment of personal property taxes to the individual counties will no longer be required in order for a person to apply for or renew an ABC license. It is the further intent of this law that various application requirements regarding convicted felon status, status as it relates to violation of liquor laws of this state or any other state and revocation of permits shall be made uniform among various permits issued by the ABC Division. Therefore, any laws that may conflict with this act shall be and the same hereby are repealed.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (6)(A).

The 2015 amendment added designation (a); substituted “A license shall not” for “No license shall” in the introductory language of (a); redesignated former (1) as (a)(1)(A) and added (a)(1)(B); substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in (a)(3); substituted “shall” for “must” in (a)(5);
updated the internal reference in (a)(6); substituted “division” for “Alcoholic Beverage Control Division” in (a)(6)(A)(ii)

(b)

; added (b); and made stylistic changes.

3-5-303. Applications — Misstatement or concealment of facts.

Any misstatement or concealment of fact in the application shall be grounds for revocation of any license issued pursuant to the application.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 244, § 1; 1973, No. 189, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-528.

Cross References.

Suspension or revocations of licenses generally, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

3-5-304. Applications — Notice requirements.

(a)(1)

After filing an acceptable application with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the applicant shall cause to be published at least once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the city in which the premises are situated or, if the premises are not in a city, in a newspaper of general circulation for the locality where the business is to be conducted, a notice that the applicant has applied for a permit to sell beer at retail.

(2)

The notice shall be in such form as the director shall prescribe by rule, regulation, or order and shall be verified.

(3)

The notice shall give the names of the applicant and the business and shall state that the applicant is a resident of Arkansas, that he or she has a good moral character, that he or she has never been convicted of a felony or had a license to sell alcoholic beverages revoked within the five (5) years preceding the date of this notice, whether issued by this state or any other state, and that he or she has not been convicted of violating laws of this state or any other state governing the sale of alcoholic beverages within five (5) years preceding the date of this notice.

(b)(1)

Within five (5) days after filing an application for a permit to sell beer at retail at any premises, a notice of the application shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the entrance to the premises.

(2)

The applicant shall notify the director of the date when the notice is first posted.

(3)

No permit shall be issued to any applicant until proper notice has been so posted on the premises for at least thirty (30) consecutive days.

(4)

The notice shall be in such form as the director shall prescribe by rule, regulation, or order.

(c)(1)

Upon receipt by the director of an application for a permit, written notice thereof, which shall include a copy of the application, shall immediately be mailed by the director to the sheriff, chief of police, if located within a city, and prosecuting attorney of the locality in which the premises are situated, and to the city board of directors or other governing body of the city in which the premises are situated, if within an incorporated area.

(2)

No license shall be issued by the director until at least thirty (30) days have passed from the mailing by the director of the notices required by this section.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 244, § 1; 1967, No. 239, § 2; 1973, No. 189, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-528; Acts 1989, No. 297, § 3; 1991, No. 606, § 6; 1995, No. 652, § 10.

Publisher's Notes.

As to legislative intent of Acts 1991, No. 606, see note to §3-5-302.

3-5-305. Applications — Protests.

Upon receipt by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division within the thirty (30) days of a protest against issuance of a permit by a governing official of the city or county to whom the notice of an application for permit has been mailed, the director shall not issue the license until he or she has held a public hearing.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 244, § 1; 1973, No. 189, § 2; 1981, No. 790, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-528.

3-5-306. Applications — Appeals.

(a)

Any appeal from an order of the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall be made to the circuit court of the county in which the premises are situated or the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

(b)

Appeals shall be governed by the terms of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 244, § 1; 1973, No. 189, § 2; 1981, No. 790, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-528.

3-5-307. Prohibited practices.

No holder of a license authorizing the sale of beer for consumption on the premises where sold or any servant, agent, or employee of the licensee shall do any of the following upon the licensed premises:

(1)

Knowingly sell beer or wine to a minor;

(2)

Knowingly sell beer or wine to any person while the person is in an intoxicated condition;

(3)

Sell beer or wine upon the licensed premises or permit beer to be consumed thereon, on any day or at any time when the sale or consumption is prohibited by law;

(4)

Permit any prostitute to frequent the licensed premises;

(5)(A)

Permit gambling or games of chance upon the licensed premises.

(B)

Permitting gambling or games of chance under subdivision (5)(A) of this section does not include:

(i)

Charitable bingo and raffles under the Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, §23-114-101 et seq.; or

(ii)

A lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, §23-115-101 et seq.;

(6)

Permit on the licensed premises any disorderly conduct, breach of the peace, or any lewd, immoral, or improper entertainment, conduct, or practices;

(7)

Sell, offer for sale, or permit the sale on the licensed premises of any kind of alcoholic liquors, except wine and beer; or

(8)

Permit the consumption on the licensed premises of wine or any other kind of alcoholic liquor, except beer.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 244, § 2; 1945, No. 119, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-529; Acts 2009, No. 605, § 11; 2009, No. 606, § 11.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by identical acts Nos. 605 and 606 inserted (5)(B), redesignated the remaining text accordingly, and made a related change.

Cross References.

On premises consumption permits, inapplicability of this section, §3-9-211.

Subchapter 4

— Native Wine Generally

Effective Dates.

Acts 2007, No. 668, § 6: Mar. 29, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that lawsuits are currently pending in both Federal Court for the Eastern District of Arkansas and Pulaski County Circuit Court regarding the constitutionality of the laws being amended by this subchapter; that the lawsuits are being defended by the office of the Arkansas Attorney General; and that immediate implementation of this act is necessary because any delay may result in substantial costs to the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-5-401 — 3-5-413. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning native wine generally, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 668, § 3. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

3-5-401. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 14223; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-601.

3-5-402. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 14224; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-602; Acts 1987, No. 424, §§ 4, 5; 2003, No. 1445, § 1.

3-5-403. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 12; Pope's Dig., § 14234; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-612; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 374.

3-5-404. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 14233; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-611.

3-5-405. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 14225; Acts 1981, No. 335, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-603; Acts 2003, No. 1445, § 2.

3-5-406. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 14226; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-604.

3-5-407. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 14231; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-609; Acts 1997, No. 1010, § 2; 1997, No. 1060, § 2.

3-5-408. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 14227; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-605.

3-5-409. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 14230; Acts 1985, No. 1052, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-608; Acts 1987, No. 424, § 6; 1991, No. 913, § 1.

3-5-410. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 14228; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-606.

3-5-411. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 14229; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-607; Acts 1987, No. 902, § 2; 1991, No. 1013, § 1; 2005, No. 1806, § 2.

3-5-412. Acts 1935, No. 69, § 10, as added by Acts 1953, No. 118, § 32(G); 1983, No. 906, § 1; 1985, No. 1052, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-608.1, 48-610.

3-5-413. Acts 1991, No. 953, §§ 1-3.

Subchapter 5

— Native Wines — Transportation

Effective Dates.

Acts 2007, No. 668, § 6: Mar. 29, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that lawsuits are currently pending in both Federal Court for the Eastern District of Arkansas and Pulaski County Circuit Court regarding the constitutionality of the laws being amended by this subchapter; that the lawsuits are being defended by the office of the Arkansas Attorney General; and that immediate implementation of this act is necessary because any delay may result in substantial costs to the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-5-501 — 3-5-505. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning transportation of native wines, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 668, § 3. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

3-5-501. Acts 1971, No. 441, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-632.

3-5-502. Acts 1971, No. 441, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-632; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 375.

3-5-503. Acts 1971, No. 441, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-632.

3-5-504. Acts 1971, No. 441, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-632.

3-5-505. Acts 1971, No. 441, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-632.

Subchapter 6

— Native Wines — Production and Sale

Effective Dates.

Acts 1975, No. 675, § 10: became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 31, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of acute shortages of premium red grapes and other fruits, severe frost and hail damage to grapes for two years in succession, increasing sugar prices with reduction in the supply of available fermentable sugars, and depressed economic conditions which have curtailed new vineyard plantings of needed varietal and generic grape types, that immediate steps must be taken to offer stimulus to the Arkansas native wine industry, thereby preserving a high level of production and employment by farmers in this State who produce fruits and grapes used by wineries, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 770, § 3: Apr. 6, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Acts 1975, No. 675 requires Arkansas wineries to file detailed reports with the Department of Finance and Administration with respect to the importation of natural fruit flavors and herb flavors, and the importation of fruits and vegetables for use in the production of native wine, and the importation of wines for blending with native wines, and that considerable expense could be saved by the department consolidating much of the report information into simplified forms, and with the detailed data to be preserved by the native wineries for departmental inspection and audit, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to accomplish such purposes and save funds by the State of Arkansas for other purposes. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2007, No. 668, § 6: Mar. 29, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that lawsuits are currently pending in both Federal Court for the Eastern District of Arkansas and Pulaski County Circuit Court regarding the constitutionality of the laws being amended by this subchapter; that the lawsuits are being defended by the office of the Arkansas Attorney General; and that immediate implementation of this act is necessary because any delay may result in substantial costs to the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-5-601. Legislative determinations and intent.

(a)(1)

The General Assembly finds and determines that, due to extremely high prices of cane sugar and in view of the difficulty Arkansas wineries experience in obtaining dependable supplies of liquid corn sugar used as fermentation sugars in the production of native wines in this state and in view of the fact that many fruits such as apples, berries, peaches, and American varieties of grapes such as Concord and Niagara, which are easily produced in Arkansas, are low in sufficient sugar content in many growing seasons to produce sound, stable wine and because of resulting extremely low alcohol content, the addition of sugar is essential to production of quality-consistent, stable wines.

(2)

It is essential that the rules pertaining to the production of native wines in this state be modified to permit Arkansas wineries to use various other sources of sugar that have been approved for wine production under applicable federal regulations.

(b)(1)

It is further determined by the General Assembly that in view of federal laws prohibiting the use of artifical flavoring in the production of natural wines it is essential for wineries to use natural fruit flavors and essences, that there is a lack of natural fruit flavor and natural essence produced in Arkansas due to the climatic conditions of this state, for example, vermouth herbs, etc., commonly imported from Europe, and that the lack of natural fruit flavor and natural essence and herbs is causing a severe drop in the sale of Arkansas native wines.

(2)

More and newer flavors of grape and apple wines are being produced, largely by wineries in the major wine-producing states and foreign countries, making it extremely difficult for Arkansas wineries to increase the exportation of native wine produced in this state into other states.

(3)

It is in the interest of the fruit and vegetable growers in this state that Arkansas wineries be able to obtain the necessary natural fruit flavors and essences required to flavor and supplement Arkansas native wines produced in this state, thereby permitting Arkansas wineries to offer to the public a broader variety of native wines and, through increased wine production, experience an increasing demand for production of fruits and vegetables in this state which are used in the production of native wines, thereby resulting in gains in employment for the citizens of this state.

(c)(1)

The General Assembly further determines that it was the purpose and intent of the Native Wine Law to promote the increased marketing and exportation of Arkansas fruits and vegetables in the form of wine and that it was not the intent of the Native Wine Law to curtail the expansion of Arkansas wineries by restricting the supply of raw materials when the supply of any particular raw material within the State of Arkansas is insufficient to sustain a properly aging quality-controlled wine product line.

(2)

The General Assembly recognizes that acts of God — storms, hail, early spring frost, root bore disease, or other natural factors — or inadequate acreage of fruit needed to sustain the product line may cause an insufficiency in the supply of particular raw materials essential in the production of wine.

(3)

The General Assembly further recognizes that many farmers in this state tend to overplant more frostproof varieties of grapes which produce heavy tonnages of grapes that, when converted into wine, result in overproduction of a particular type of wine, which is difficult to sell unless blended with other types of wines to make the same easily marketable.

(4)

These factors and adverse circumstances, coupled with skyrocketing production costs and substantial increases in sugar prices, are causing a decline in the sale of Arkansas wines which may force wineries out of business, with a resulting loss of an established market for the sale of Arkansas grapes and other fruits and vegetables which are produced for sale to wineries.

(d)(1)

The General Assembly is aware of the laws of other states having native wine laws which have adopted the federal laws and regulations as pertaining to the appellation of origin and the blending and proper labeling of wines, which allow a wine to carry the name of the state in which produced on its label as long as seventy-five percent (75%) of the fruit or materials from which the wine is made is grown within the state designated on the label.

(2)

Wineries in other states are thereby enjoying greater flexibility in overcoming weather damage which enables them to market and produce nationally with greater ease. The enactment of comparable provisions is essential to assure that Arkansas wineries and fruit and vegetable growers who sell and produce fruits and vegetables to be used in making wine have a fair competitive position with wineries of other states.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 675, §§ 2, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-634n, 48-635n; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 67.

Publisher's Notes.

The Native Wine Law referred to in this section is codified as §§3-5-401 —3-5-412 (repealed by Acts 2007, No. 688, § 3), and3-5-803.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(2).

3-5-602. Rules.

(a)

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to establish appropriate rules, if he or she deems it advisable, to simplify the furnishing of information to the Department of Finance and Administration as required under the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The secretary may promulgate forms which are to be filed with the department abbreviating information now required to be furnished under this subchapter or may waive in writing the filing of any information with the department on condition that the information and records will be kept by Arkansas wineries for department inspection and audit.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 770, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-633.1; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 68; 2019, No. 910, § 3313.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “secretary” for “director” in (a) and (b).

3-5-603. Bottling — Tax.

(a)

In order to enable Arkansas wineries which produce native wines to sell their products to interstate and intrastate passenger airline companies and to passenger railroads in containers for their convenience and use, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board is authorized to promulgate rules to permit the bottling of wines produced by wineries in this state in two-fifths (2/5) of a pint or split size wine containers, or other nearest metric size practicable when the metric system of measurement is phased into operation in this country, for sale to airlines and passenger railroads for sale for consumption thereon.

(b)

The rules may also authorize the packaging of wines produced in two-fifths (2/5) of a pint or split size containers in the form of cluster sampler packages for sale in package form under such rules as the board shall determine, for sale in this state or for export sale in other states.

(c)

The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to collect the necessary taxes in the same manner as now prescribed by law on the twentieth day of the month, on sales in Arkansas for the month preceding, on wines bottled and packaged under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, which are sold in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 675, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-633; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 69.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” twice in (b).

3-5-604. Importing natural fruit flavors and herb flavors.

(a)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Department of Finance and Administration are authorized to permit Arkansas wineries to bring into Arkansas natural fruit flavors and herb flavors which cannot be acquired in Arkansas and to use such flavors according to existing federal regulations regarding natural fruit flavors and formula approval for each blend of wine.

(b)

The use of such natural fruit and herb flavors in the production of wines produced from fruits and vegetables grown in this state shall in no way deprive the Arkansas wineries of the benefits of the Native Wine Law with respect to the tax to be levied upon each gallon of native wine produced and sold in this state.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 675, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-634.

Publisher's Notes.

The Native Wine Law referred to in this section is codified as §§3-5-401 —3-5-412 (repealed by Acts 2007, No. 688, § 3), and3-5-803.

3-5-605. Importing fruits and vegetables.

(a)

Arkansas wineries are authorized to import into this state, in private or common carriers, fruits and vegetables grown outside the State of Arkansas in various forms so as to facilitate economic transportation and to use the fruits or vegetables in the production of wine according to applicable federal wine regulations, and labeled according to federal wine regulations.

(b)

The importation of fruits and vegetables and the use thereof in wine production shall be in accordance with reasonable rules promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration to assure compliance with this subchapter and prevent abuse thereof.

(c)(1)

An Arkansas winery importing fruits or vegetables grown outside the State of Arkansas for use in making wines in this state shall pay the seventy-five-cents-per-gallon tax levied on imported wines or wines produced from fruits and vegetables not grown in this state or on wine made from such juices extracted from fruits or vegetables brought into the state if the wine is sold in Arkansas.

(2)

The tax shall be paid in the same manner as prescribed by law on the twentieth day of the month on sales in Arkansas for the month preceding.

(3)

Records at the Arkansas winery required by federal law shall be maintained to reflect the ratio of blend of Arkansas-grown wine and the amount of wine in the blend made from the fruits or vegetables grown outside the State of Arkansas.

(4)

The seventy-five-cents-per-gallon tax shall be required to be paid only on the portion of the blend made from fruits or vegetables grown outside the State of Arkansas which are sold in Arkansas.

(5)

The tax on the Arkansas-grown portion of the wine blend shall be the same as now required on wines produced from Arkansas-grown fruits and vegetables.

(d)

Records of wine blends shall be preserved by the winery for a period of three (3) years from the relevant date of the record. These records shall be available on the premises at all times for the reasonable inspection by authorized agents of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the department.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 675, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-635; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 70.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

Cross References.

Tax on imported wines and wines produced from fruits and vegetables not grown in Arkansas, §3-7-104.

3-5-606. Importing wines for blending.

(a)(1)

Arkansas wineries are authorized to import into Arkansas finished or unfinished wines for blending with Arkansas red or white wines.

(2)

The wines shall be shipped into this state and blended according to regulations as set forth in federal regulations and labeled according to federal regulations which require that the appellation of origin of “Arkansas Wines” can be used only on those wines which contain seventy-five percent (75%) Arkansas-grown grapes or other materials.

(b)

The Arkansas winery shall pay a tax of seventy-five cents (75¢) per gallon on all wines imported into this state if the wines are sold in Arkansas. The seventy-five-cents-per-gallon tax shall be required to be paid only on the portion of the blend not grown and produced in Arkansas. The tax on the Arkansas-grown portion of the wine blend shall be the same as now required for wines produced from Arkansas-produced fruits and vegetables.

(c)

The tax shall be paid in the same manner as prescribed on the twentieth day of the month of sale in Arkansas for the month preceding.

(d)

The Arkansas winery shall keep records as required by federal law to show the ratio of blend of Arkansas-grown wines and the amount of out-of-state wines used in the blend.

(e)

The Department of Finance and Administration shall establish appropriate rules for the reporting and collecting of the tax on imported wines used in such blends.

(f)

To facilitate differentiation of taxes to the State of Arkansas on a wine blend under the provisions of this subchapter, a copy of the blend-ratio record which identifies the wine type or class shall accompany tax remittances for shipments made for sale in Arkansas for each particular blend.

(g)

Records of the blends shall be preserved by a winery for a period of three (3) years from the relevant date of the record and shall be available on the premises at all times for reasonable inspection by authorized agents of the department.

(h)

The Arkansas winery desiring to import wines into Arkansas to be used in blending with Arkansas wines as authorized in this subchapter shall make application for a permit to be issued by the Miscellaneous Tax Section of the Office of Excise Tax Administration, to import wines in the same manner presently required for brandy.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 675, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-636; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 71.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (e).

Cross References.

Native wine, gallonage tax, §3-7-104.

3-5-607. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning tax incentive for export of local wines, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 668, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1975, No. 675, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-637.

Subchapter 7

— Wine Producers Council

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-5-701. Creation — Members.

(a)(1)

There is created the Arkansas Wine Producers Council to be composed of seven (7) members.

(2)(A)

Four (4) members of the council shall be selected from the state at large, appointed by the Governor, and confirmed by the Senate.

(B)

The Governor shall consult the Arkansas Wine Producers Association and the Arkansas State Horticultural Society before making an appointment under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section.

(3)

One (1) member of the council shall be designated by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas and shall be a faculty member or administrator who is knowledgeable in viniculture.

(4)

One (1) member shall be designated by the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, and the member shall be either a member or employee of the commission.

(b)

All successor members shall be appointed or designated for terms of three (3) years.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 912, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-649; Acts 2015, No. 1100, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

The terms of the members of the Arkansas Wine Producers Council are arranged so that three terms expire every three years and two terms expire in each of the two intervening years.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(2); deleted former (a)(3); and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

3-5-702. Officers.

At the first meeting of the Arkansas Wine Producers Council, it shall select from its membership a chair and vice-chair and any other officers it may deem necessary or appropriate to effectively carry out its responsibilities.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 912, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-650.

3-5-703. Powers and duties.

(a)

The Arkansas Wine Producers Council shall have the authority and responsibility to promote research concerning the production of wine grapes and the manufacture of wine in Arkansas and to take any other action it deems necessary or appropriate to promote and support the Arkansas native wine industry.

(b)

The council shall have the exclusive authority to expend any and all funds deposited into the Arkansas Wine Producers Council Fund in the State Treasury for promoting research concerning the production of wine grapes and the manufacture of wine in Arkansas and for promoting the Arkansas native wine industry through the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission.

(c)

The council shall consider proposals for research projects submitted by university research institutions relating to the production of wine grapes and the manufacture of wine in Arkansas and proposals which promote the Arkansas native wine industry and tourism related to the industry submitted by the commission.

(d)

Upon approval by a majority vote of the council of a proposal for research by a university research institution or for promotion or tourism by the commission, the council shall direct the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to transfer on the Department of Finance and Administration books, and shall cause to be transferred on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State, such amounts as determined by the council from the Arkansas Wine Producers Council Fund to the Department of Commerce Fund Account and to the operating fund or fund accounts of approved research institutions. Use of these funds may be applied as prescribed in this section in the various states of the United States and foreign countries.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 912, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-651; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 127.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Commerce Fund Account” for “Department of Parks and Tourism Commerce Fund Account” in the first sentence of (d).